Illinois, session 104th, SB3227.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Program Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) It is in the interest of this State to preserve and 8    protect Illinois' water resources by incentivizing 9    efficient fertilizer management strategies and the use of 10    innovative crop nutrient technologies to help farmers 11    manage and improve their commercial nitrogen fertilizer 12    application rates.13        (2) Innovative fertilizer management strategies and 14    crop nutrient technologies, including biological sources 15    of nitrogen, are growing in popularity and proving an 16    effective tool for managing fertilizer loss while 17    maximizing yields in the State of Illinois. Such 18    strategies and technologies can help farmers maximize 19    productivity while reducing nitrate leaching and runoff 20    and subsequent negative environmental impacts.21        (3) Therefore, a nitrogen reduction incentive program 22    should be established in this State. This program should 23    cost $5,000,000 in its first year and renew annually for   SB3227- 2 -LRB104 18773 BDA 32216 b1    at least 4 years in order to accomplish the goals of the 2    General Assembly. 3    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:4    "Commercial nitrogen fertilizer" means fertilizer with a 5nitrogen content of no less than 25%.6    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.7    "Fertilizer" means any substance containing one or more of 8plant nutrients that is used for its plant nutrient content 9and is designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting 10plant growth. "Fertilizer" does not include unmanipulated 11animal and vegetable manures, sea solids, marl, lime, 12limestone, wood ashes, and other products excluded by rule of 13the Department.14    "Plant nutrient" means nitrogen, phosphate, potash, or any 15other nutrient used in accordance with 8 Ill. Adm. Code 210. 16    Section 15. Nitrogen reduction incentive program.17    (a) In consultation with the Department of Natural 18Resources and Illinois soil and water conservation districts, 19the Department shall develop a nitrogen reduction incentive 20program by January 1, 2027, to further address water quality 21by incentivizing Illinois farmers to improve nitrogen 22management and incorporate innovative technologies into their 23crop nutrient management plans. The Department shall determine 24the scope of qualifying products, fertilizers with nitrogen   SB3227- 3 -LRB104 18773 BDA 32216 b1fixing properties, biological sources of nitrogen, and other 2biofertilizers. The Department shall administer the program. 3The program shall provide an annual per-acre incentive for 4qualifying farmers who verify through documentation that 5commercial nitrogen fertilizer rates were reduced by the 6lesser of (i) 15% or (ii) 30 pounds per acre by incorporating a 7qualifying product, as determined by the Department, in the 8farmer's fertility plans. A commercial nitrogen fertilizer 9rate reduction from historic baseline use shall be required to 10qualify for the program.11    (b) The Department shall review at least once during the 12life of the nitrogen reduction incentive program: (1) the 13required minimum commercial nitrogen fertilizer rate of 14reduction for the program to determine if higher reduction 15targets are warranted; and (2) additional qualifying products, 16accounting for newly available technologies and products 17capable of reducing commercial nitrogen fertilizer 18applications for inclusion in the program.19    (c) The Department shall keep the nitrogen reduction 20incentive program open to all farmers in this State. The 21Department shall adopt rules that establish a standard for 22labeled products to qualify for the incentive program.23    (d) In consultation with farmers and the agriculture 24industry, a per-acre payment rate, not less than $5 per acre, 25shall be established by the Department, and the Department 26shall periodically review the rates based on inflation or   SB3227- 4 -LRB104 18773 BDA 32216 b1emerging technology in subsequent years. Payments shall be 2distributed to qualifying entities once nitrogen reduction 3incentive program requirements are met. The nitrogen reduction 4incentive program established under this Section shall renew 5annually for 4 years.6    (e) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 7Act.8    (f) This Section is subject to appropriation. 9    Section 20. Confidential Records. The crop management 10records collected from farmers, including, but not limited to, 11field boundaries, crop yields, or nitrogen rates, shall be 12used solely for implementation of this Act and shall be 13considered confidential records. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.